Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB574.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 620.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is dependent,
neglected, or abused, or that a child has been born to a parent who has another
child in the care, custody, or control of the cabinet or other person as a result of
removal pursuant to this chapter, shall immediately cause an oral or written report,
including but not limited to electronic submissions, to be made to a local law
enforcement agency or to the Department of Kentucky State Police, the cabinet or
its designated representative, the Commonwealth's attorney, or the county attorney
by telephone or otherwise. If the cabinet receives a report of abuse or neglect
allegedly committed by a person other than a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in
a position of authority, person in a position of special trust, or person exercising
custodial control or supervision, the cabinet shall refer the matter to the
Commonwealth's attorney or the county attorney and the local law enforcement
agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police. Nothing in this section shall
relieve individuals of their obligations to report.
(2) (a) Any person, including but not limited to a physician, osteopathic physician,
nurse, teacher, school personnel, social worker, coroner, medical examiner,
child-caring personnel, resident, intern, chiropractor, dentist, optometrist,
emergency medical technician, paramedic, health professional, mental health
professional, peace officer, or any organization or agency for any of the
above, who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is
dependent, neglected, or abused, regardless of whether the person believed to
have caused the dependency, neglect, or abuse is a parent, guardian, fictive
kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of special trust,
person exercising custodial control or supervision, or another person, or who
Page 1 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
has attended such child as a part of his or her professional duties, shall:
1. Immediately make an oral or written report, including but not limited to
electronic submissions, in accordance with subsection (1) of this section;
2. Immediately notify the supervisor of the institution, school, facility,
agency, or designated agent of the person in charge; and
3. If requested, in addition to the report required in subsection (1) or (3) of
this section, file with the local law enforcement agency or the
Department of Kentucky State Police, the cabinet or its designated
representative, the Commonwealth's attorney, or county attorney within
forty-eight (48) hours of the original report a written report, including
but not limited to electronic submissions, containing:
a. The names and addresses of the child and his or her parents or
other persons exercising custodial control or supervision;
b. The child's age;
c. The nature and extent of the child's alleged dependency, neglect,
or abuse, including any previous charges of dependency, neglect,
or abuse, to this child or his or her siblings;
d. The name and address of the person allegedly responsible for the
abuse or neglect; and
e. Any other information that the person making the report believes
may be helpful in the furtherance of the purpose of this section.
(b) Upon notification, the supervisor or the designated agent, if any, shall
facilitate the cooperation of the institution, school, facility, or agency with the
investigation of the report.
(c) Any person who knowingly causes intimidation, retaliation, or obstruction in
the investigation of the report shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) This section shall not require more than one (1) report from any institution,
Page 2 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
school, facility, or agency.
(3) Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is a victim of
human trafficking as defined in KRS 529.010 shall immediately cause an oral or
written report, including but not limited to electronic submissions, to be made to a
local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police; or the
cabinet or its designated representative; or the Commonwealth's attorney or the
county attorney; by telephone or otherwise. This subsection shall apply regardless
of whether the person believed to have caused the human trafficking of the child is
a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position
of special trust, or person exercising custodial control or supervision.
(4) Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is a victim of
female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125 shall immediately cause an
oral or written report, including but not limited to electronic submissions, to be
made by telephone or otherwise to:
(a) A local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police;
(b) The cabinet or its designated representative; or
(c) The Commonwealth's attorney or the county attorney.
This subsection shall apply regardless of whether the person believed to have
caused the female genital mutilation of the child is a parent, guardian, or person
exercising custodial control or supervision.
(5) Neither the husband-wife nor any professional-client/patient privilege, except the
attorney-client and clergy-penitent privilege, shall be a ground for refusing to report
under this section or for excluding evidence regarding a dependent, neglected, or
abused child or the cause thereof, in any judicial proceedings resulting from a report
pursuant to this section. This subsection shall also apply in any criminal proceeding
in District or Circuit Court regarding a dependent, neglected, or abused child.
(6) The cabinet shall establish and operate a statewide reporting system for the public
Page 3 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
to make reports of child dependency, neglect, and abuse via telephone call or
written report, including but not limited to electronic submissions. The statewide
reporting system shall operate a twenty-four (24) hour on-call response system that
includes but is not limited to a child abuse hotline for the receipt of emergency and
nonemergency reports of child dependency, neglect, and abuse during and after
normal office hours. The cabinet may use contract employees to operate the system.
(7) The cabinet upon request shall receive from any agency of the state or any other
agency, institution, or facility providing services to the child or his or her family,
such cooperation, assistance, and information as will enable the cabinet to fulfill its
responsibilities under KRS 620.030, 620.040, and 620.050.
(8) Nothing in this section shall limit the cabinet's investigatory authority under KRS
620.050 or any other obligation imposed by law.
(9) Any person who intentionally violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty
of a:
(a) Class B misdemeanor for the first offense;
(b) Class A misdemeanor for the second offense; and
(c) Class D felony for each subsequent offense.
Section 2. KRS 620.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon receipt of a report alleging abuse or neglect of a child as defined in KRS
600.020 by a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority,
person in a position of special trust, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision, pursuant to KRS 620.030(1) or (2), [or ]a report alleging a child
is a victim of human trafficking pursuant to KRS 620.030(3), or a report that
a child has been born to a parent who has another child in the care,
custody, or control of the cabinet or other person as a result of removal
pursuant to this chapter, the recipient of the report shall immediately notify
the cabinet or its designated representative, the local law enforcement agency
Page 4 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
or the Department of Kentucky State Police, and the Commonwealth's or
county attorney of the receipt of the report. If any agency listed above is the
reporting source, the recipient shall immediately notify the cabinet or its
designated representative, the local law enforcement agency, the Department
of Kentucky State Police, and the Commonwealth's or county attorney of the
receipt of the report.
(b) Based upon the allegation in the report, the cabinet shall immediately make an
initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate safety of the child.
Based upon the level of risk determined, the cabinet shall investigate the
allegation or accept the report for an assessment of family needs and, if
appropriate, may provide or make referral to any community-based services
necessary to reduce risk to the child and to provide family support. A report of
sexual abuse or human trafficking of a child shall be considered high risk and
shall not be referred to any other community agency.
(c) 1. There is a rebuttable presumption that a child born to a parent who
has another child in the care, custody, or control of the cabinet or
other person as a result of removal pursuant to this chapter is in
immediate danger of dependency, neglect, or abuse, and the cabinet
shall immediately make an initial determination as to the risk of harm
and immediate safety of the child. If the cabinet does not locate the
child within fourteen (14) days to make the initial determination, the
cabinet shall contact local law enforcement to assist in locating the
child. If the cabinet determines that the presumption has been
rebutted, either due to the fact that the parent is successfully
participating in cabinet- or court-directed services or due to other
reasons, and the child is not subject to an immediate threat to the
child's health or safety, the cabinet shall maintain a record of the
Page 5 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
determination; the previous allegations, complaints, or petitions
against the parent; and the evidence rebutting the presumption to have
an additional level of review by the Commissioner of the Department
for Community Based Services within the cabinet or designee.
2. Following removal of a child from the custody of the child's parent
after an investigation required by this paragraph, the cabinet shall not
return the child to the parent's custody unless:
a. A guardian ad litem has been appointed for the child;
b. A full investigation has been conducted by the department as
required by this section, and the results of the investigation,
including any previous allegations, complaints, or petitions of
dependency, neglect, or abuse against the parent, have been
presented to the court at a hearing to determine whether the
child is dependent, neglected, or abused; and
c. The court determines by a preponderance of evidence that the
child will be provided a safe home.
(d) In making the initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate
safety of the child pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet
shall at a minimum:
1. Consider the age and vulnerability of a child, particularly for ages five
(5) years of age and under, when assessing allegations of abuse and
neglect;
2. Automatically accept for investigation a subsequent report from a
professional reporting source, who makes a report pursuant to the
requirements in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is abused or neglected and
identifies himself or herself by name, title, and employer, when the same
or similar allegation has been reported by one (1) or more unique
Page 6 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
professional reporting sources within the past thirty (30) days. For the
purposes of this subparagraph "professional reporting source" means an
individual who is a social worker, therapist, medical professional,
educator, judge, attorney, law enforcement officer, or any other
individual holding a degree or position in a field related to the safety and
care of children; and
3. Automatically accept for investigation a report from a court of
appropriate jurisdiction that makes a report pursuant to the requirements
in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is abused or neglected or identifies that
the child is a plaintiff in an active emergency protective order or
interpersonal protection order case.
(e)[(d)] The cabinet shall, within seventy-two (72) hours, exclusive of weekends
and holidays, make a written report, including but not limited to electronic
submissions, to the Commonwealth's or county attorney and the local law
enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police concerning
the action that has been taken on the investigation.
(f)[(e)] If the report alleges abuse or neglect by someone other than a parent,
guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of
special trust, or person exercising custodial control or supervision, or the
human trafficking of a child, the cabinet shall immediately notify the
Commonwealth's or county attorney and the local law enforcement agency or
the Department of Kentucky State Police.
(2) (a) Upon receipt of a report alleging dependency pursuant to KRS 620.030(1) and
(2), the recipient shall immediately notify the cabinet or its designated
representative.
(b) Based upon the allegation in the report, the cabinet shall immediately make an
initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate safety of the child.
Page 7 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
Based upon the level of risk, the cabinet shall investigate the allegation or
accept the report for an assessment of family needs and, if appropriate, may
provide or make referral to any community-based services necessary to reduce
risk to the child and to provide family support. A report of sexual abuse or
human trafficking of a child shall be considered high risk and shall not be
referred to any other community agency.
(c) In making the initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate
safety of the child pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet
shall at a minimum:
1. Consider the age and vulnerability of a child, particularly for ages five
(5) years of age and under, when assessing allegations of dependency;
2. Automatically accept for investigation a subsequent report from a
professional reporting source, who makes a report pursuant to the
requirements in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is dependent and
identifies himself or herself by name, title, and employer, when the same
or similar allegation has been reported by one (1) or more unique
professional reporting sources within the past thirty (30) days. For the
purposes of this subparagraph "professional reporting source" means an
individual who is a social worker, therapist, medical professional,
educator, judge, attorney, law enforcement officer, or any other
individual holding a degree or position in a field related to the safety and
care of children; and
3. Automatically accept for investigation a report from a court of
appropriate jurisdiction that makes a report pursuant to the requirements
in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is dependent or identifies that the child
is a plaintiff in an active emergency protective order or interpersonal
protection order case.
Page 8 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
(d) The cabinet need not notify the local law enforcement agency or the
Department of Kentucky State Police or Commonwealth's or county attorney
of reports made under this subsection unless the report involves the human
trafficking of a child, in which case the notification shall be required.
(3) If the cabinet or its designated representative receives a report of abuse by a person
other than a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in
a position of special trust, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of a child, it shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency
or the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Commonwealth's or county
attorney of the receipt of the report and its contents, and they shall investigate the
matter. The cabinet or its designated representative shall participate in an
investigation of noncustodial physical abuse or neglect at the request of the local
law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police. The cabinet
shall participate in all investigations of reported or suspected sexual abuse or human
trafficking of a child.
(4) School personnel or other persons listed in KRS 620.030(2) do not have the
authority to conduct internal investigations in lieu of the official investigations
outlined in this section.
(5) (a) If, after receiving the report, the law enforcement officer, the cabinet, or its
designated representative cannot gain admission to the location of the child, a
search warrant shall be requested from, and may be issued by, the judge to the
appropriate law enforcement official upon probable cause that the child is
dependent, neglected, or abused. If, pursuant to a search under a warrant, a
child is discovered and appears to be in imminent danger, the child may be
removed by the law enforcement officer.
(b) If a child who is in a hospital or under the immediate care of a physician
appears to be in imminent danger if he or she is returned to the persons having
Page 9 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
custody of him or her, the physician or hospital administrator may hold the
child without court order, provided that a request is made to the court for an
emergency custody order at the earliest practicable time, not to exceed
seventy-two (72) hours.
(c) Any appropriate law enforcement officer may take a child into protective
custody and may hold that child in protective custody without the consent of
the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision if there
exist reasonable grounds for the officer to believe that the child is in danger of
imminent death or serious physical injury, is being sexually abused, or is a
victim of human trafficking and that the parents or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision are unable or unwilling to protect the child.
The officer or the person to whom the officer entrusts the child shall, within
twelve (12) hours of taking the child into protective custody, request the court
to issue an emergency custody order.
(d) When a law enforcement officer, hospital administrator, or physician takes a
child into custody without the consent of the parent or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision, he or she shall provide written notice to the
parent or other person stating the reasons for removal of the child. Failure of
the parent or other person to receive notice shall not, by itself, be cause for
civil or criminal liability.
(e) 1. If a report includes a child fatality or near fatality, and the law
enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe any parent or
person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child was under
the influence of alcohol or drugs at the time the fatality or near fatality
occurred, the law enforcement officer shall request a test of blood,
breath, or urine from that person.
2. If, after making the request, consent is not given for the test of blood,
Page 10 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
breath, or urine, a search warrant shall be requested from and may be
issued by the judge to the appropriate law enforcement official upon
probable cause that a child fatality or near fatality has occurred and that
the person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child at the
time of the fatality or near fatality was under the influence.
3. Any test requested under this section shall be conducted pursuant to the
testing procedures and requirements in KRS 189A.103.
(6) The cabinet shall make efforts as soon as practicable to determine any military
status of a parent or legal guardian of a child who is the subject of an investigation
or assessment pursuant to this section. If the cabinet determines that the parent or
legal guardian is a member of the United States Armed Forces, the cabinet shall
notify the Department of Defense family advocacy program operating within the
service member's assigned installation of the investigation or assessment and
provide case information.
(7) To the extent practicable and when in the best interest of a child alleged to have
been abused, interviews with the child shall be conducted at a children's advocacy
center.
(8) (a) One (1) or more multidisciplinary teams may be established in every county
or group of contiguous counties.
(b) Membership of the multidisciplinary team shall include but shall not be
limited to social service workers employed by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services and law enforcement officers. Additional team members may
include Commonwealth's and county attorneys, children's advocacy center
staff, mental health professionals, medical professionals, victim advocates
including advocates for victims of human trafficking, educators, and other
related professionals, as deemed appropriate.
(c) The multidisciplinary team shall review child sexual abuse cases and child
Page 11 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
human trafficking cases involving commercial sexual activity referred by
participating professionals, including those in which the alleged perpetrator
does not have custodial control or supervision of the child or is not
responsible for the child's welfare. The purpose of the multidisciplinary team
shall be to review investigations, assess service delivery, and to facilitate
efficient and appropriate disposition of cases through the criminal justice
system.
(d) The team shall hold regularly scheduled meetings if new reports of sexual
abuse or child human trafficking cases involving commercial sexual activity
are received or if active cases exist. At each meeting, each active case shall be
presented and the agencies' responses assessed.
(e) The multidisciplinary team shall provide an annual report to the public of
nonidentifying case information to allow assessment of the processing and
disposition of child sexual abuse cases and child human trafficking cases
involving commercial sexual activity.
(f) Multidisciplinary team members and anyone invited by the multidisciplinary
team to participate in a meeting shall not divulge case information, including
information regarding the identity of the victim or source of the report. Team
members and others attending meetings shall sign a confidentiality statement
that is consistent with statutory prohibitions on disclosure of this information.
(g) The multidisciplinary team shall, pursuant to KRS 431.600 and 431.660,
develop a local protocol consistent with the model protocol issued by the
Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse. The local
team shall submit the protocol to the commission for review and approval.
(h) The multidisciplinary team review of a case may include information from
reports generated by agencies, organizations, or individuals that are
responsible for investigation, prosecution, or treatment in the case, KRS
Page 12 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
610.320 to KRS 610.340 notwithstanding.
(i) To the extent practicable, multidisciplinary teams shall be staffed by the local
children's advocacy center.
(9) Nothing in this section shall limit the cabinet's investigatory authority under KRS
620.050 or any other obligation imposed by law.
Section 3. KRS 620.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Anyone acting upon reasonable cause in the making of a report or acting under
KRS 620.030 to 620.050 in good faith shall have immunity from any liability, civil
or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall
have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding
resulting from such report or action. However, any person who knowingly makes a
false report and does so with malice shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) Any employee or designated agent of a children's advocacy center shall be immune
from any civil liability arising from performance within the scope of the person's
duties as provided in KRS 620.030 to 620.050. Any such person shall have the
same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding. Nothing in
this subsection shall limit liability for negligence. Upon the request of an employee
or designated agent of a children's advocacy center, the Attorney General shall
provide for the defense of any civil action brought against the employee or
designated agent as provided under KRS 12.211 to 12.215.
(3) Neither the husband-wife nor any professional-client/patient privilege, except the
attorney-client and clergy-penitent privilege, shall be a ground for refusing to report
under this section or for excluding evidence regarding a dependent, neglected, or
abused child or the cause thereof, in any judicial proceedings resulting from a report
pursuant to this section. This subsection shall also apply in any criminal proceeding
in District or Circuit Court regarding a dependent, neglected, or abused child.
(4) Upon receipt of a report of an abused, neglected, or dependent child pursuant to this
Page 13 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
chapter, or a report of a child who has been born to a parent who has another
child in the care, custody, or control of the cabinet or other person as a result of
removal pursuant to this chapter, the cabinet as the designated agency or its
delegated representative shall initiate a prompt investigation or assessment of
family needs, take necessary action, and shall offer protective services toward
safeguarding the welfare of the child. The cabinet shall work toward preventing
further dependency, neglect, or abuse of the child or any other child under the same
care, and preserve and strengthen family life, where possible, by enhancing parental
capacity for adequate child care. If an oral or written report, including but not
limited to electronic submissions, alleging that a child is dependent, neglected, or
abused is made pursuant to this section, and the cabinet determines that the report
does not meet criteria for an investigation, the cabinet shall refer the family to
appropriate community-based child and family service agencies for services to
preserve and strengthen family life in accordance with the requirements in 42
U.S.C. sec. 5106a.
(5) The report of suspected child abuse, neglect, or dependency and all information
obtained by the cabinet or its delegated representative, as a result of an investigation
or assessment made pursuant to this chapter, except for those records provided for
in subsection (6) of this section, shall not be divulged to anyone except:
(a) Persons suspected of causing dependency, neglect, or abuse;
(b) The custodial parent or legal guardian of the child alleged to be dependent,
neglected, or abused;
(c) Persons within the cabinet with a legitimate interest or responsibility related
to the case;
(d) A licensed child-caring facility or child-placing agency evaluating placement
for or serving a child who is believed to be the victim of an abuse, neglect, or
dependency report;
Page 14 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
(e) Other medical, psychological, educational, or social service agencies, child
care administrators, corrections personnel, or law enforcement agencies,
including the county attorney's office, the coroner, and the local child fatality
response team, that have a legitimate interest in the case;
(f) A noncustodial parent when the dependency, neglect, or abuse is
substantiated;
(g) Members of multidisciplinary teams as defined by KRS 620.020 and which
operate pursuant to KRS 431.600;
(h) Employees or designated agents of a children's advocacy center;
(i) Those persons so authorized by court order; or
(j) The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by KRS
620.055.
(6) (a) Files, reports, notes, photographs, records, electronic and other
communications, and working papers used or developed by a children's
advocacy center in providing services under this chapter are confidential and
shall not be disclosed except to the following persons:
1. Staff employed by the cabinet, law enforcement officers, and
Commonwealth's and county attorneys who are directly involved in the
investigation or prosecution of the case, including a cabinet
investigation or assessment of child abuse, neglect, and dependency in
accordance with this chapter;
2. Medical and mental health professionals listed by name in a release of
information signed by the guardian of the child, provided that the
information shared is limited to that necessary to promote the physical
or psychological health of the child or to treat the child for abuse-related
symptoms;
3. The court and those persons so authorized by a court order;
Page 15 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
4. The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by
KRS 620.055; and
5. The parties to an administrative hearing conducted by the cabinet or its
designee in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B in an appeal of a cabinet-
substantiated finding of abuse or neglect. The children's advocacy center
may, in its sole discretion, provide testimony in lieu of files, reports,
notes, photographs, records, electronic and other communications, and
working papers used or developed by the center if the center determines
that the release poses a threat to the safety or well-being of the child, or
would be in the best interests of the child. Following the administrative
hearing and any judicial review, the parties to the administrative hearing
shall return all files, reports, notes, photographs, records, electronic and
other communications, and working papers used or developed by the
children's advocacy center to the center.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as to contravene the
Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to discovery.
(7) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a parent or guardian from accessing records
for his or her child providing that the parent or guardian is not currently under
investigation by a law enforcement agency or the cabinet relating to the abuse or
neglect of a child.
(8) Nothing in this section shall prohibit employees or designated agents of a children's
advocacy center from disclosing information during a multidisciplinary team
review of a child sexual abuse case as set forth under KRS 620.040. Persons
receiving this information shall sign a confidentiality statement consistent with
statutory prohibitions on disclosure of this information.
(9) Employees or designated agents of a children's advocacy center may confirm to
another children's advocacy center that a child has been seen for services. If an
Page 16 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
information release has been signed by the guardian of the child, a children's
advocacy center may disclose relevant information to another children's advocacy
center.
(10) (a) An interview of a child recorded at a children's advocacy center shall not be
duplicated, except that the Commonwealth's or county attorney prosecuting
the case may:
1. Make and retain one (1) copy of the interview; and
2. Make one (1) copy for the defendant's or respondent's counsel that the
defendant's or respondent's counsel shall not duplicate.
(b) The defendant's or respondent's counsel shall file the copy with the court clerk
at the close of the case.
(c) Unless objected to by the victim or victims, the court, on its own motion, or
on motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth shall order all recorded
interviews that are introduced into evidence or are in the possession of the
children's advocacy center, law enforcement, the prosecution, or the court to
be sealed.
(d) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as to contravene the
Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to discovery.
(11) Identifying information concerning the individual initiating the report under KRS
620.030 shall not be disclosed except:
(a) To law enforcement officials that have a legitimate interest in the case;
(b) To the agency designated by the cabinet to investigate or assess the report;
(c) To members of multidisciplinary teams as defined by KRS 620.020 that
operated under KRS 431.600;
(d) Under a court order, after the court has conducted an in camera review of the
record of the state related to the report and has found reasonable cause to
believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report; or
Page 17 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
(e) The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by KRS
620.055.
(12) (a) Information may be publicly disclosed by the cabinet in a case where child
abuse or neglect has resulted in a child fatality or near fatality.
(b) The cabinet shall conduct an internal review of any case where child abuse or
neglect has resulted in a child fatality or near fatality and the cabinet had prior
involvement with the child or family. The cabinet shall prepare a summary
that includes an account of:
1. The cabinet's actions and any policy or personnel changes taken or to be
taken, including the results of appeals, as a result of the findings from
the internal review; and
2. Any cooperation, assistance, or information from any agency of the state
or any other agency, institution, or facility providing services to the
child or family that were requested and received by the cabinet during
the investigation of a child fatality or near fatality.
(c) The cabinet shall submit a report by September 1 of each year containing an
analysis of all summaries of internal reviews occurring during the previous
year and an analysis of historical trends to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the state child fatality review team created under KRS
211.684.
(13) When an adult who is the subject of information made confidential by subsection
(5) of this section publicly reveals or causes to be revealed any significant part of
the confidential matter or information, the confidentiality afforded by subsection (5)
of this section is presumed voluntarily waived, and confidential information and
records about the person making or causing the public disclosure, not already
disclosed but related to the information made public, may be disclosed if disclosure
is in the best interest of the child or is necessary for the administration of the
Page 18 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
cabinet's duties under this chapter.
(14) As a result of any report of suspected child abuse or neglect, photographs and X-
rays or other appropriate medical diagnostic procedures may be taken or caused to
be taken, without the consent of the parent or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision of the child, as a part of the medical evaluation or
investigation of these reports. These photographs and X-rays or results of other
medical diagnostic procedures may be introduced into evidence in any subsequent
judicial proceedings or an administrative hearing conducted by the cabinet or its
designee in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B in an appeal of a cabinet-
substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect. The person performing the
diagnostic procedures or taking photographs or X-rays shall be immune from
criminal or civil liability for having performed the act. Nothing herein shall limit
liability for negligence.
(15) In accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 671, the cabinet shall share information about a
child in the custody of the cabinet with a relative or a parent of the child's sibling
for the purposes of:
(a) Evaluating or arranging a placement for the child;
(b) Arranging appropriate treatment services for the child; or
(c) Establishing visitation between the child and a relative, including a sibling of
the child.
(16) In accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 671, the cabinet shall, in the case of siblings
removed from their home who are not jointly placed, provide for frequent visitation
or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless the cabinet determines that
frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or
well-being of any of the siblings.
Section 4. KRS 620.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court for the county where the child ordinarily resides or will reside or the
Page 19 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
county where the child is present may issue an ex parte emergency custody order
when it appears to the court that removal is in the best interest of the child and that
there are reasonable grounds to believe, as supported by affidavit or by recorded
sworn testimony, that one (1) or more of the following conditions exist and that the
parents or other person exercising custodial control or supervision are unable or
unwilling to protect the child:
(a) The child is in danger of imminent death or serious physical injury or is being
sexually abused;
(b) The parent has repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be inflicted by other than
accidental means physical injury or emotional injury. This condition shall not
include reasonable and ordinary discipline recognized in the community
where the child lives, as long as reasonable and ordinary discipline does not
result in abuse or neglect as defined in KRS 600.020(1);[ or]
(c) The child is in immediate danger due to the parent's failure or refusal to
provide for the safety or needs of the child; or
(d) The parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision has
another child in the care, custody, or control of the cabinet or other person
as a result a removal pursuant to this chapter, creating a rebuttable
presumption that the child is in immediate danger of dependency, neglect,
or abuse.
(2) Custody may be placed with a relative taking into account the wishes of the
custodial parent and child or any other appropriate person or agency including the
cabinet.
(3) An emergency custody order shall be effective no longer than seventy-two (72)
hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, unless there is a temporary removal
hearing with oral or other notice to the county attorney and the parent or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, to determine if the
Page 20 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
child should be held for a longer period. The seventy-two (72) hour period also may
be extended or delayed upon the waiver or request of the child's parent or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision.
(4) Any person authorized to serve process shall serve the parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision with a copy of the emergency custody
order. If such person cannot be found, the sheriff shall make a good faith effort to
notify the nearest known relative, neighbor, or other person familiar with the child.
(5) Within seventy-two (72) hours of the taking of a child into custody without the
consent of his or her parent or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision, a petition shall be filed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Nothing herein shall preclude the issuance of arrest warrants pursuant to the Rules
of Criminal Procedure.
Section 5. KRS 620.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless waived by the child and his or her parent or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision, a temporary removal hearing shall be held:
(a) Within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays, of the time
when an emergency custody order is issued or when a child is taken into
custody without the consent of his or her parent or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision; and
(b) In cases commenced by the filing of a petition, within ten (10) days of the
date of filing.
(2) At a temporary removal hearing, the court shall determine whether there are
reasonable grounds to believe that the child would be dependent, neglected or
abused if returned to or left in the custody of his or her parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision even though it is not proved
conclusively who has perpetrated the dependency, neglect or abuse. For good cause,
the court may allow hearsay evidence. The Commonwealth shall bear the burden of
Page 21 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1085
proof by a preponderance of the evidence and if the Commonwealth should fail to
establish same, the child shall be released to or retained in the custody of his or her
parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision.
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that the child would be dependent, neglected,
or abused if returned to or left in the custody of his or her parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision if the parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision has another child in the care, custody,
or control of the cabinet or other person as a result of removal pursuant to this
chapter.
Section 6. This Act may be cited as Baby Miya's Law.
Page 22 of 22
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:22 PM Jacketed